Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 27 Trespass to Unlawfully Collect Resource Data

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 183, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§
40-27-101.
Trespass to unlawfully collect resource data; unlawful collection of resource data.

A person commits a civil trespass to unlawfully collect resource data from private land if he:

Enters onto private land for the purpose of collecting resource data; and

Does not have:

An ownership interest in the real property or statutory, contractual or other legal authorization to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data; or

Written or verbal permission of the owner, lessee or agent of the owner to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data.

A person commits a civil trespass of unlawfully collecting resource data if he enters onto private land and collects resource data from private land without:

An ownership interest in the real property or, statutory, contractual or other legal authorization to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data; or

Written or verbal permission of the owner, lessee or agent of the owner to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data.

A person commits a civil trespass to access adjacent or proximate land if he:

Crosses private land to access adjacent or proximate land where he collects resource data; and

Does not have:

An ownership interest in the real property or, statutory, contractual or other legal authorization to cross the private land; or

Written or verbal permission of the owner, lessee or agent of the owner to cross the private land.

A person who trespasses to unlawfully collect resource data, a person who unlawfully collects resource data or a person who trespasses to access adjacent or proximate land under this section shall be liable in a civil action by the owner or lessee of the land for all consequential and economic damages proximately caused by the trespass. In a civil action brought under this section, in addition to damages, a successful claimant shall be awarded litigation costs. For purposes of this subsection, “litigation costs” shall include, but is not limited to, court costs, expert witness fees, other witness fees, costs associated with depositions and discovery, reasonable attorney fees and the reasonably necessary costs of identifying the trespasser, of obtaining effective service of process on the trespasser and of successfully effecting the collection of any judgment against the trespasser.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 115, § 2.

Resource data unlawfully collected on private land under this section is not admissible in evidence in any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding, other than a civil action for trespassing under this section or a criminal prosecution for trespassing under W.S.

6-3-414

.

Resource data unlawfully collected on private land under this section in the possession of any governmental entity as defined by W.S. 1-39-103(a)(i) shall be expunged by the entity from all files and data bases, and it shall not be considered in determining any agency action.

As used in this section:

“Collect” means to take a sample of material, acquire, gather, photograph or otherwise preserve information in any form and the recording of a legal description or geographical coordinates of the location of the collection;

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

;

“Resource data” means data relating to land or land use, including but not limited to data regarding agriculture, minerals, geology, history, cultural artifacts, archeology, air, water, soil, conservation, habitat, vegetation or animal species. “Resource data” does not include data:

For surveying to determine property boundaries or the location of survey monuments;

Used by a state or local governmental entity to assess property values;

Collected or intended to be collected by a peace officer while engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties.

History.

2015 ch. 183, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 115, §§ 1, 2, effective March 14, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 115 § 1, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “from private land” following “data”; in (a)(i) substituted “private” for “open” preceding “land”; in (a)(i)(A), substituted “enter the private land” for “enter or access the land” and inserted “the specified” preceding “resource data”; in (a)(ii)(B), deleted “open” following “private” and inserted “from private land” following “data”; in the introductory language of (b), deleted “open” preceding “land” and inserted “from private land” preceding “without”; in (b)(ii), inserted “private” preceding “land”; added present (c); redesignated former (c) as (d) and inserted “or a person who trespasses to access adjacent or proximate land” in the first sentence; redesignated former (d) as (f) and inserted “on private land” following “collected”; redesignated former (f) as (g) and inserted “on private land” following “collected”; and added (h).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 115 § 2, repealed former (e), which read: “Resource data unlawfully collected under this section is not admissible in evidence in any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding, other than a civil action for trespassing under this section or a criminal prosecution for trespass.”

Laws 2016 ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

Definition provision. —

2015 Senate Enrolled Act 82, original SF 80, created section

40-26-101

. [later redesignated as 40–27–101]. Section 2 of that Enrolled Act was inserted by adopted House third reading amendment number 1, which provided:

“Section 2.

If 2015 Senate File 12 is enacted into law, W.S. 40-26-101(d) in section 1 of this act is repealed and recreated to read:

40-26-101

. Trespass to unlawfully collect resource data.

(d) Resource data unlawfully collected under this section is not admissible in evidence in any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding, other than a civil action for trespassing under this section or a criminal prosecution for trespassing under W.S.

6-3-414

.

2015 Senate File 12 was enacted into law, therefore W.S. 40-26-101(d) above contains the language as directed by Section 2.
However, House third reading amendment number 2 to SF 80 inserted a new subsection (b) and renumbered subsequent subsections.
The later third reading amendment did not address the earlier amendment's reference to subsection (d), resulting in the repeal of the following definitional section:

(d) As used in this section:

“Collect” means to take a sample of material, acquire, gather, photograph or otherwise preserve information in any form from open land which is submitted or intended to be submitted to any agency of the state or federal government;

“Open land” means land outside the exterior boundaries of any incorporated city, town, subdivision approved pursuant to W.S.

18-5-308

or development approved pursuant to W.S.

18-5-403

;

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

;

“Resource data” means data relating to land or land use, including but not limited to data regarding agriculture, minerals, geology, history, cultural artifacts, archeology, air, water, soil, conservation, habitat, vegetation or animal species. "Resource data" does not include data:

For surveying to determine property boundaries or the location of survey monuments;

Used by a state or local governmental entity to assess property values;

Collected or intended to be collected by a peace officer while engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties.

The combined effect of the two amendments also resulted in two nearly identical subsections as set forth above, (d) and (e).
While the repeal of the definitional subsection and duplication appear to have been inadvertent, the statute as set forth above reflects Senate Enrolled Act 82 as signed by the Senate President, House Speaker and Governor.

Editor’s notes. —

This section, as enacted by Laws 2015, Chapter 183, section 1,
created Chapter 26, W.S.

40-26-101

. This section has been redesignated as Chapter 27, W.S.

40-27-101

, at the direction of the legislative service office.

Constitutional. —

Construction. —

Primary jurisdiction. —

Violation. —

Standing. —

Exhaustion of administrative remedies. —

Protected speech. —

Constitutional. —

Plaintiffs could not have maintained a Free Speech First Amendment challenge because the statutes did not regulate protected First Amendment activity, there was no constitutionally protected First Amendment right to enter upon the private lands of another for the purposes of collecting data, the statutes were not facially overbroad, and the court declined to conduct a facial analysis of the statutes' expungement provisions. Western Watersheds Project v. Michael, 196 F. Supp. 3d 1231, 2016 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 88843 (D. Wyo. 2016), rev'd, 869 F.3d 1189,

2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 17279

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

Statutes passed
the rational basis test and therefore did not violate the Equal Protection
Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment because the statutes were not promulgated
out of animus toward a particular group, and did not burden a fundamental
right because the statutes precluded trespassing to collect any resource
data, regardless of whether that data was favorable or unfavorable
to the owner, and the statutes rationally related to the interest
of protecting private property rights. Western Watersheds Project v. Michael, 196 F. Supp. 3d 1231, 2016 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 88843 (D. Wyo. 2016), rev'd, 869 F.3d 1189,

2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 17279

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

Construction. —

Statute is unambiguous; the legislature intended the statute to apply in situations where a person unlawfully collects resource data from private lands, and the statute does not exclude oil and gas matters. Devon Energy Prod. Co. LP v. Grayson Mill Operating, LLC, 2020 WY 28, 458 P.3d 1201,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2020).

Primary jurisdiction. —

Because the district court is solely vested with jurisdiction to determine if a civil trespass occurred, the district court abused its discretion in dismissing a foreign limited partnership’s complaint under the primary jurisdiction doctrine; the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission was unable to consider the partnership’s claim for a civil trespass and, therefore, the district court erred in finding the Commission was better situated to address the issues presented in the complaint. Devon Energy Prod. Co. LP v. Grayson Mill Operating, LLC, 2020 WY 28, 458 P.3d 1201,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2020).

Violation. —

Statute could not be used to invalidate a limited liability company’s Application for Permits to Drill because the remedy for violating the statute under the circumstances was expungement Devon Energy Prod. Co. LP v. Grayson Mill Operating, LLC, 2020 WY 28, 2020 Wyo. LEXIS 29 (February 27, 2020).

Standing. —

Foreign limited partnership pleaded enough facts to establish standing to bring a trespass claim under the statute because it claimed it was a lessee over the subject lands and suffered injury due to a Wyoming limited liability company’s actions. Devon Energy Prod. Co. LP v. Grayson Mill Operating, LLC, 2020 WY 28, 458 P.3d 1201, 2020 Wyo. LEXIS 29 (Wyo. 2020).

Exhaustion of administrative remedies. —

District court abused its discretion in dismissing a foreign limited partnership’s trespass complaint for failing to exhaust administrative remedies because the exhaustion of administrative remedies doctrine did not apply since the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission did not have jurisdiction under the Oil and Gas Conservation Act to consider a civil trespass; there was no specific administrative process for the partnership to bring a trespass claim to the Commission for consideration. Devon Energy Prod. Co. LP v. Grayson Mill Operating, LLC, 2020 WY 28, 458 P.3d 1201, 2020 Wyo. LEXIS 29 (Wyo. 2020).

Protected speech. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-3-414

,

40-27-101

(2016) regulated protected speech under First Amendment,
and they were not shielded from constitutional scrutiny merely because
they touched upon access to private property; although trespassing
did not enjoy First Amendment protection, statutes targeted creation
of speech by imposing heightened penalties on those who collected
resource data. Western Watersheds Project v. Michael, 869 F.3d 1189, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 17279 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).